Washington statutes.
RCW 18.19.210

Agency affiliated counselors—Employment status—Duty to notify department.

(1)(a) An applicant for an agency affiliated counselor credential who applies to the department within thirty days of employment by an agency may work as an agency affiliated counselor while the application is processed. The applicant must provide required documentation within reasonable time limits established by the department, and if the applicant does not do so, the applicant must stop working.

(b) The applicant may not provide unsupervised services prior to completion of a criminal background check performed by either the employer or the secretary. For purposes of this subsection, "unsupervised" means the supervisor is not physically present at the location where the counseling occurs.

(2) Agency affiliated counselors shall notify the department if they are either no longer employed by the agency identified on their application or are now employed with another agency, or both. Agency affiliated counselors may not engage in the practice of counseling or other services described under RCW 18.19.215 unless they are currently affiliated with an agency.

[ 2023 c 425 s 19; 2019 c 446 s 47; 2013 c 338 s 6; 2008 c 135 s 9.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2023 c 425 ss 1-7, 13-20, and 22-26: See note following RCW 18.83.170.

Effective date—2008 c 135 ss 1, 2, 7-9, and 11-19: See note following RCW 18.19.020.